Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 9. Mines and Mining

§ 1. Inspector of mines.

There shall be established and maintained the office of inspector of mines, the duties of which shall be prescribed by law. (As amended by Laws 1989, Senate Joint Resolution No. 5, p. 771.)

Cross references. —

As to inspector of mines generally, see §§

30-2-201

to

30-2-213

.

Cited

in

Albany Mut. Bldg. Ass'n v. City of Laramie, 10 Wyo. 54, 65 P. 1011,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1901); State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1921).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

§ 2. Legislature to enact regulatory laws.

The legislature shall provide by law for the proper development, ventilation, drainage and operation of all mines in this state.

Cross references. —

For provision that 8 hours constitute lawful day's work in mines, see art. 19, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to regulatory laws, see title 30.

Cited

in

Burton v. Union Pac. Coal Co., 18 Wyo. 362, 107 P. 391,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1910).

§ 3. Restrictions on employment in mines. [Repealed.]

Cross references. —

As to employment of children generally, see §§

27-6-107

to

27-6-116

.

Section repealed. —

The section, relating to restrictions on mine employment, was repealed by a constitutional amendment proposed by Laws 1977, House Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 929, adopted by a vote of the people on November 7, 1978, and declared in effect on November 25, 1978.

§ 4. Right of action for injuries.

For any injury to person or property caused by wilful failure to comply with the provisions of this article, or laws passed in pursuance hereof, a right of action shall accrue to the party injured, for the damage sustained thereby, and in all cases in this state, whenever the death of a person shall be caused by wrongful act, neglect or default, such as would, if death had not ensued, have entitled the party injured to maintain an action to recover damages in respect thereof, the person who, or the corporation which would have been liable, if death had not ensued, shall be liable to an action for damages notwithstanding the death of the person injured, and the legislature shall provide by law at its first session for the manner in which the right of action in respect thereto shall be enforced.

Cross references. —

As to action for wrongful death, see §§

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

.

As to worker's compensation, see §§

27-14-101

through

27-14-806

.

Amendment to art. 10, § 4, Wyo. Const., relating to worker's compensation takes precedence

over this earlier art. 9, § 4, if they cannot be harmonized.
Parker v. Energy Dev. Co., 691 P.2d 981,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1984).

Compensation benefits take place of tort suit. —

An injured miner whose employer has complied with the Wyoming law regarding worker's compensation does not have an independent cause of action against his employer as compensation benefits take the place thereof. Jackson v. Dravo Corp., 603 F.2d 156, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 12565 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act provided exclusive remedy for death of employee killed in mining accident, and therefore survivors and personal representative could not maintain wrongful death action against mining operator, despite allegations of negligence and safety violations by operator. Anderson v. Solvay Minerals, Inc., 3 P.3d 236,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, Collins v. COP Wyo., LLC, 2016 WY 18, 366 P.3d 521,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2016).

Provisions inapplicable to negligence claims. —

The provisions of this article have no pertinence to a case in which the claims for relief are premised on negligence and not on willfulness or on intentional tort. Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982).

This section is not a provision for the survival of personal injury actions.

Parsons v. Roussalis, 488 P.2d 1050,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1971).

Wrongful death action against representative of deceased wrongdoer. —

Prior to the 1947 amendment of §

1-38-101

, a wrongful death action could not be maintained against the personal representatives of the deceased wrongdoer either under that statute or under this section. The provisions of art. 1, § 8, Wyo. Const., did not change this rule. Mull v. Wienbarg, 66 Wyo. 410, 212 P.2d 380,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1949).

Limitation on amount of recovery for death. —

A statutory provision limiting the amount of recovery for death to $5,000.00 was not repealed or repugnant to the constitution on its adoption. Mestas v. Diamond Coal & Coke Co., 12 Wyo. 414, 76 P. 567,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1904).

Supreme court review. —

The supreme court would not pass upon a question reserved to it by the district court as to negligence under a statute which authorized reservation of constitutional questions only, as the question was a proposition of statutory construction and not constitutional. Burton v. Union Pac. Coal Co., 18 Wyo. 362, 107 P. 391,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1910), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 362, 112 P. 841,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1911).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Jamison v. Forsyth, 21 Wyo. 359, 133 P. 521,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1913).

Quoted in

Collins v. COP Wyo., LLC, 2016 WY 18,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb. 10, 2016).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Constitutionality of Wyoming's Co-employee Immunity Statute under Article 10, Section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 355 (1983).

§ 5. School of mines.

The legislature may provide that the science of mining and metallurgy be taught in one of the institutions of learning under the patronage of the state.

Cross references. —

For provision that mining and metallurgy be taught at the university of Wyoming, see §

21-17-102

.

§ 6. State geologist. [Repealed.]

Section repealed. —

This section was repealed by a constitutional amendment proposed by Laws 1989, Senate Joint Resolution No. 10, p. 771, adopted by a vote of the people on November 6, 1990, and declared in effect November 20, 1990. For present similar provisions, see
§§

9-2-801

through

9-2-803

,

9-2-806

.